Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 5. Virginia Coastal Energy Research Consortium.

§ 45.2-1714.
Virginia Coastal Energy Research Consortium established; board of directors.

The Virginia Coastal Energy Research Consortium is hereby established to include Old Dominion University, the Virginia Institute of Marine Science of The College of William and Mary in Virginia, the Advanced Research Institute of Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University, James Madison University, Norfolk State University, Virginia Commonwealth University, Hampton University, George Mason University, and the University of Virginia and is to be located at Old Dominion University.

The Consortium shall be governed by a board of directors (the Board), which shall consist of 16 voting members as follows: the Director or his designee, the Commissioner of Marine Resources or his designee, the President of the Virginia Manufacturers Association or his appointed member of the maritime manufacturing industry, the President of the Virginia Maritime Association or his appointed member of the maritime industry, the Director of the Advanced Research Institute of Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University or his designee, the President of Old Dominion University or his designee, the Director of the Virginia Institute of Marine Science of The College of William and Mary in Virginia or his designee, the President of Norfolk State University or his designee, the President of James Madison University or his designee, the President of Virginia Commonwealth University or his designee, the President of the University of Virginia or his designee, the President of Hampton University or his designee, the President of George Mason University or his designee, the chairman of the Hampton Roads Technology Council or his appointed member of the technology community, the Director of the Hampton Roads Clean Cities Coalition or his appointed member of the renewable energy industry, and the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality or his designee as the lead agency for the Virginia Coastal Zone Management Program.In addition, a representative of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration’s Langley Research Center, to be selected by the Director of the Research Center, shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member of the Board.

History.

2006, c. 939, §§
67-600, 67-602; 2007, c. 904; 2009, c. 575; 2010, c. 695; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532
amended former § 67-602 from which this section is derived. Since the same change was made by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, the amendment by c. 532 was not given effect.

§ 45.2-1715.
Functions, powers, and duties of the Consortium.

The Consortium shall serve as an interdisciplinary study, research, and information resource for the Commonwealth on coastal energy issues. As used in this article, “coastal energy” includes wave or tidal action, currents, offshore winds, thermal differences, and methane hydrates. The Consortium shall (i) consult with the General Assembly, federal, state, and local agencies, nonprofit organizations, private industry, and other potential users of coastal energy research; (ii) establish and administer agreements with other baccalaureate institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth to carry out research projects relating to the feasibility of increasing the Commonwealth’s reliance on all domestic forms of coastal energy; (iii) disseminate new information and research results; (iv) apply for grants made available pursuant to federal legislation, including the federal Methane Hydrate Research and Development Act of 2000, P.L. 106-193, and from other sources; and (v) facilitate the application and transfer of new coastal energy technologies.

History.

2006, c. 939, § 67-601; 2009, c. 575; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1716.
Appointment of a director; powers and duties.

The Board shall appoint an executive director to serve as the principal administrative officer of the Consortium. The executive director shall report to the Board and be under its supervision.

The executive director shall exercise all powers imposed upon him by law, carry out the specific duties imposed upon him by the Board, and develop appropriate policies and procedures for (i) identifying priority coastal energy research projects; (ii) cooperating with the General Assembly, federal, state, and local governmental agencies, nonprofit organizations, and private industry in formulating its research projects; (iii) selecting research projects to be funded; and (iv) disseminating information and transferring technology related to coastal energy within the Commonwealth. The executive director shall employ such personnel and secure such services as may be required to carry out the purposes of the Consortium, expend appropriated funds, and accept moneys from federal or private sources for cost-sharing on coastal energy projects.

History.

2006, c. 939, §§ 67-603, 67-604; 2009, c. 575; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.